Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 5. Cattle Tuberculosis.

§ 69-15-201.
Employment of veterinarians to co-operate in tests.

The State Veterinarian, with the approval and consent of the Board of Animal Health is directed to employ one or more qualified veterinarians to be paid from the funds at the disposal of said board, who shall cooperate with the veterinarians of the U.S. Department of Agriculture, Bureau of Animal Industry, in testing cattle for tuberculosis in this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5506a; 1930, § 5417; 1942, § 4840; Laws, 1920, ch. 327; Laws, 1930, ch. 99; Laws, 1990, ch. 519, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1990).

§ 69-15-203.
Veterinarians to be detailed to aid counties.

The State Veterinarian is directed to detail a veterinarian to assist such counties as desire to undertake the control and eradication of tuberculosis among cattle and such assistance shall be given to the counties in the order in which request is made and to the extent that the funds of the board will permit.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5506b; 1930, § 5418; 1942, § 4841; Laws, 1920, ch. 327; Laws, 1930, ch. 99; Laws, 1990, ch. 519, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1990).

§ 69-15-205.
Elections on tuberculosis control.

The board of supervisors of any county in the State of Mississippi may, by order entered on the minutes of said board, express their intention to engage in the eradication of tuberculosis, in livestock under the area plan in co-operation with the board of animal health, and the United States Bureau of Animal Industry. Such order so entered upon the minutes of said board shall be published for thirty days in a newspaper published in said county and having a general circulation therein, and at the expiration of said thirty days if twenty per cent or more of the qualified electors of said county shall not file with said board a petition protesting against said order, the board shall enter an order upon their minutes to so engage in said eradication provided for in the previous order; but should twenty per cent or more of the qualified electors of said county file with said board a petition protesting against said order, then the board of supervisors shall call an election, after having given the notice required by law, and if a majority of the qualified electors of said county voting at said election in favor of engaging in such eradication, then the board shall enter upon its minutes an order to that effect; should a majority of the qualified electors of said county voting fail to vote in favor of engaging in such eradication, then said board shall enter an order upon its minutes refusing to engage in such eradication.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5506c; 1930, § 5419; 1942, § 4842; Laws, 1920, ch. 327; Laws, 1930, ch. 99.

§ 69-15-207.
Submission of cattle for tuberculin tests.

In counties doing tuberculosis eradication work under the provisions of this article, owners of cattle are required to submit all their cattle to be tuberculin tested at such time and place as designated by the board of animal health, and provide such help as may be needed by the inspector doing the work.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5423; 1942, § 4846; Laws, 1930, ch. 99.

§ 69-15-209.
Condemnation, branding and disposition of cattle reacting to tuberculin tests.

Cattle which react to the tuberculin test or show marked diagnostic symptoms of tuberculosis shall be condemned and branded with the letter “T” on the left jaw, and be disposed of as directed by the board of animal health.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5506e; 1930, § 5422; 1942, § 4845; Laws, 1920, ch. 327; Laws, 1930, ch. 99.

§ 69-15-211.
Payment for condemned cattle in counties engaged in tuberculosis eradication under area plan; appraisement.

The county boards of supervisors of counties engaged in eradicating tuberculosis in livestock under the area plan in co-operation with the board of animal health and the United States Bureau of Animal Industry may pay out of the general funds of the county money for necessary expenditure including the employment of accredited or approved veterinarians and for the payment of indemnity to cattle owners who have animals slaughtered because of having reacted to a tuberculin test authorized by the board and the United States Bureau of Animal Industry. Provided that said animals so classed are appraised and slaughtered as provided in the rules and regulations of the board of animal health. The indemnity received shall not exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for each grade animal or One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for each registered animal so condemned.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5506d; 1930, § 5420; 1942, § 4843; Laws, 1920, ch. 327; Laws, 1930, ch. 99.

§ 69-15-213.
Payment for condemned cattle in counties not operating on area plan.

The boards of supervisors of the various counties of the State of Mississippi which are not engaged in the eradication of bovine tuberculosis on the area plan, may in their discretion, pay indemnity on cattle which react to a co-operative tuberculin test authorized by the Mississippi Board of Animal Health on the same basis as provided in Section 69-15-211.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5421; 1942, § 4844; Laws, 1930, ch. 99.